North Carolina, session 2025, HB742.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act may be cited as the "North Carolina Healthy Schools Act of
2025."
SECTION 2. Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 17A.
"Healthy Schools.
"§ 115C-267.1. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds the following:
(1) Children are vulnerable to and may be severely affected by exposure to
chemicals, hazardous waste, and other environmental hazards.
(2) The United States Environmental Protection Agency estimates that human
exposure to indoor air pollutants can be two to five times and up to 100 times
higher than outdoor exposure levels.
(3) Children, teachers, janitors, and other staff members spend a significant
amount of time inside school buildings and are continuously exposed to
chemicals from cleaners, waxes, deodorizers, and other maintenance products.
"§ 115C-267.2. Use of green cleaning supplies.
(a) When it is economically feasible, all public school units shall establish a green
cleaning policy and exclusively purchase and use environmentally sensitive cleaning products
pursuant to the guidelines and specifications established under G.S. 115C-267.3.
(b) If adopting a green cleaning policy under this section is not economically feasible, a
public school shall provide, until such time that it is economically feasible, annual written
notification to the Department of Public Instruction on a form provided by the Department that
the development and implementation of a green cleaning policy is not economically feasible.
(c) For purposes of this section, adopting a green cleaning policy is not economically
feasible if adopting the policy would result in an increase in the cleaning costs of the school.
"§ 115C-267.3. Green cleaning supply guidelines and specifications.
(a) The Department of Public Instruction, in coordination with the Department of Health
and Human Services and a panel of interested stakeholders, including cleaning product industry
representatives, nongovernmental organizations, and others, shall establish and amend on an
annual basis guidelines and specifications for healthy and environmentally sensitive cleaning and
maintenance products for use in school facilities. The Department of Public Instruction shall
*H742-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
provide multiple avenues by which cleaning products may be determined to be environmentally
sensitive under the guidelines. Guidelines and specifications may include implementation
practices, including inspection. The completed guidelines and specifications shall be posted on
the Department of Public Instruction's website.
(b) The Department of Public Instruction shall distribute a copy of the guidelines and
specifications to each public school unit and each nonpublic school that has 50 or more students
enrolled. The Department shall also provide these schools with any updates to the guidelines and
specifications."
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) Healthy and Environmentally Sensitive Cleaning and Maintenance Products.
– Local boards of education shall be subject to the requirements of Article
17A of this Chapter."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(37) Healthy and environmentally sensitive cleaning and maintenance products. –
The board of trustees shall be subject to the requirements of Article 17A of
this Chapter."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) Healthy and Environmentally Sensitive Cleaning and Maintenance Products. – A
charter school shall be subject to the requirements of Article 17A of this Chapter."
SECTION 3.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) Healthy and environmentally sensitive cleaning and maintenance products. –
A regional school shall be subject to the requirements of Article 17A of this
Chapter."
SECTION 3.(e) G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(12f) The Board of Governors shall be subject to the requirements of Article 17A
of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes for all public secondary schools
operated under the control of the Board of Governors."
SECTION 4. Part 4 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-566.5. Healthy and environmentally sensitive cleaning and maintenance products.
When it is economically feasible, a nonpublic school that has 50 or more students enrolled is
encouraged to adopt a green cleaning policy consistent with Article 17A of this Chapter."
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding Article 17A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes,
as enacted by Section 2 of this act, a school may deplete its existing cleaning and maintenance
supply stocks and implement the new requirements under Article 17A of Chapter 115C of the
General Statutes, as enacted by Section 2 of this act, in the procurement cycle for the following
school year.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-267.3, as enacted by Section 2 of this act,
the Department of Public Instruction shall establish initial guidelines and specifications after a
review and evaluation of existing research that shall be completed no later than 180 days after
the effective date of this act.
SECTION 7. No State funds shall be appropriated and no State funds are required
to implement Article 17A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section 2 of
this act.
SECTION 8. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 742-First Edition